District of Columbia statutes.
47-2847

Saving clause.

Any violation of any provision of law or regulation issued hereunder which is repealed by this chapter and any liability arising under such provisions or regulations may, if the violation occurred or the liability arose prior to such repeal, be prosecuted to the same extent as if this chapter had not been enacted.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 49
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 563, ch. 366
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(h), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2847.
1973 Ed., § 47-2348.